Hawaii statutes.
§510-4 Control of wife's separate property.
The wife has the same right to manage, control, dispose of, and otherwise deal
with her separate property as would be applicable with respect to her property
generally were it not for the enactment of this chapter. [L 1945, c 273, pt of
§1; RL 1955, §326-4; HRS §510-4]

Cross References

Spouse's separate property, see §572-25.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next